Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1634.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Honorable James F. Prendergast Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The Honorable James F. Prendergast was born February 5, 1917, in Easton, Northampton County.(2) Mr. Prendergast graduated from Easton High School in 1934 and received a bachelor of arts degree from Lafayette College in 1938.(3) Mr. Prendergast served as a second lieutenant in the United States Marine Corps during World War II.(4) Mr. Prendergast was awarded the Navy Cross for his valor during the Battle of Saipan in the South Pacific and 123456789101112131415161718 was a double Purple Heart recipient.(5) Following the war, Mr. Prendergast received a bachelor of laws degree from George Washington University Law School in 1951, was admitted to the bar in Washington, DC, in 1952, and opened his law practice in Easton in 1953.(6) Mr. Prendergast was elected to represent the 136th Legislative District in the Pennsylvania House of Representatives in 1958 and was reelected for nine consecutive terms thereafter, serving a total of 20 years as a State Representative.(7) During his tenure in the Pennsylvania House of Representatives, Mr. Prendergast's peers elected him to serve as the Majority Caucus Secretary from 1965 to 1966, the Minority Caucus Chairman from 1967 to 1968 and 1973 to 1974, the Majority Whip from 1968 to 1972 and the Majority Caucus Administrator from 1975 to 1978.(8) Mr. Prendergast also served appointments to the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee from 1963 to 1964 and the Joint State Government Commission from 1967 to 1974 and served as a delegate to Pennsylvania's Constitutional Convention in 1968.(9) Mr. Prendergast passed away April 29, 1985, in Easton, Northampton County.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 28737, carrying 13th Street over Bushkill Creek in the City of Easton, Northampton County, is designated the Honorable James F. Prendergast Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.20250HB1634PN1984 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1634PN1984 - 3 - 12